Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
Article 8 Control of Junkyards

Cross references.

Waste management generally, T. 12, C. 8.

Junk dealers, T. 43, C. 22.

Scrap metal processors, T. 43, C. 43.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules and regulations governing the control of junkyards, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Department of Transportation, Chapter 672-8.

32-6-240.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Automobile graveyard” means any establishment which is maintained or used for storing, buying, or selling wrecked, scrapped, ruined, or dismantled motor vehicles or motor vehicle parts.

“Junk” means old or scrap copper, brass, rope, rags, batteries, paper, trash, rubber, debris, or waste; junked, dismantled, or wrecked automobiles, or parts thereof; or iron, steel, and other old scrap ferrous or nonferrous material.

“Junkyard” means any establishment which is maintained or used for storing, buying, or selling junk or for an automobile graveyard; and the term shall include garbage dumps, sanitary fills, and scrap processor establishments.

“Primary system” or “primary highway” means the federal-aid primary system in existence on June 1, 1991, and any highway which is not on such system, but which is on the National Highway System, as officially designated or as may hereafter be so designated by the department and approved by the United States Secretary of Transportation pursuant to the provisions of Title 23, Section 103, United States Code.

“Scrap processor” means any person, firm, or corporation engaged only in the business of buying scrap iron and metals, including but not limited to old automobiles, for the specific purpose of processing into raw material for remelting purposes only, and whose principal product is ferrous and nonferrous scrap for shipment to steel mills, foundries, smelters, and refineries, and who maintains an established place of business in this state and has facilities and machinery designed for such processing.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 433, § 3; Code 1933, § 95A-905, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 601, § 5/SB 160.

Law reviews.

For article, “Recommendations Regarding Control of Outdoor Advertising Along the Interstate Highway System in Georgia,” see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 308 (1963).

32-6-241.
Restrictions on location of junkyards in relation to location of rights of way of interstate or federal-aid primary highways.

The department is responsible for the control of junkyards only on those primary highways that are state roads. For all primary highways it shall be unlawful for any person to establish, operate, or maintain any junkyard, any portion of which is within 1,000 feet of the nearest edge of the right of way of any interstate or federal-aid primary highway, except:

Those which are screened by natural objects, plantings, fences, or other appropriate means or which are otherwise removed from sight so as not to be visible from the main traveled way of such highway systems;

Those located within areas which are zoned for industrial use under authority of law;

Those located within unzoned industrial areas, which areas shall be determined from actual land uses and defined by regulations promulgated by the commissioner; and

Those which are not visible from the main traveled way of the systems.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 433, § 4; Code 1933, § 95A-906, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 601, § 6/SB 160.

Law reviews.

For article, “Recommendations Regarding Control of Outdoor Advertising Along the Interstate Highway System in Georgia,” see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 308 (1963).

32-6-242.
Screening junkyards in existence on April 6, 1967.

Any junkyard lawfully in existence on April 6, 1967, which is within 1,000 feet of the nearest edge of the right of way and visible from the main traveled way of any public road on the interstate or primary system, shall, whenever feasible, be screened by the department if such road is on the state highway system, otherwise by the county or municipal government having jurisdiction, so as not to be visible from such public road. Such junkyards may be screened at locations either on the right of way of such public road or on property acquired by the department for that purpose outside such right of way. Whenever the commissioner determines that it is in the best interest of the state, the department may acquire, pursuant to any of the procedures for property acquisition set forth in Article 1 of Chapter 3 of this title, such property or interests therein outside existing public road rights of way as may be necessary to provide adequate screening of such junkyards.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 433, § 5; Code 1933, § 95A-907, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 601, § 7/SB 160.

Law reviews.

For article, “Recommendations Regarding Control of Outdoor Advertising Along the Interstate Highway System in Georgia,” see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 308 (1963).

32-6-243.
Promulgation by department of regulations governing the screening and fencing of junkyards.

For any interstate or primary highway on the state highway system, the department may promulgate uniform and reasonable regulations governing the screening or fencing of junkyards, including the materials used in such screening or fencing and the location, construction, and maintenance thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 433, § 7; Code 1933, § 95A-908, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 601, § 8/SB 160.

Law reviews.

For article, “Recommendations Regarding Control of Outdoor Advertising Along the Interstate Highway System in Georgia,” see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 308 (1963).

32-6-244.
Authority of commissioner or local officials to acquire land and remove junkyards.

For state roads on the primary system, when the commissioner or, with regard to nonstate roads on the primary system, the principal elected officials of the county or municipality having jurisdiction determines that the topography of the land adjoining such a road will not permit adequate screening of any junkyard lawfully in existence on April 6, 1967, or that such screening would not be economically feasible, the department or the local officials shall have the authority to acquire, pursuant to any of the procedures for property acquisition authorized in Article 1 of Chapter 3 of this title, such interests in lands as may be necessary to secure the relocation, removal, or disposal of such junkyard. The commissioner or the local officials shall determine whether it would be more feasible to relocate, remove, or dispose of the junkyards which cannot be screened, and such determination shall be final and conclusive.

All junkyards lawfully in existence on April 6, 1967, which do not conform to the requirements of Code Section 32-6-241 and which, in the determination of the commissioner or the principal elected officials of the county or municipality having jurisdiction, cannot be made to conform by screening, shall be required to be removed under this Code section as soon as funds are available for that purpose, provided that the department or the county or municipality having jurisdiction shall not be required to expend any funds for screening or removal under this article unless and until federal-aid matching funds are made available for this purpose.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 433, §§ 8, 10, 14; Code 1933, § 95A-909, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 601, § 9/SB 160.

Law reviews.

For article, “Recommendations Regarding Control of Outdoor Advertising Along the Interstate Highway System in Georgia,” see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 308 (1963).

32-6-245.
Agreements with United States Secretary of Transportation.

The Georgia Department of Transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with the United States Secretary of Transportation, as provided by Title 23 of the United States Code, relating to the control of junkyards in areas adjacent to the interstate system and state routes on the primary systems; and the department may take action in the name of the state to comply with the terms of such agreements.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 433, § 13; Code 1933, § 95A-911, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 601, § 10/SB 160.

U.S. Code.

Provision in Title 23 of the United States Code, relating to the control of junkyards in areas adjacent to interstate and federal-aid primary systems, referred to in this Code section, are found in

23 U.S.C. § 136

.

Law reviews.

For article, “Recommendations Regarding Control of Outdoor Advertising Along the Interstate Highway System in Georgia,” see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 308 (1963).

32-6-246.
Abatement of nuisances.

Any junkyard which comes into existence after April 6, 1967, the establishment, operation, or maintenance of which is made unlawful by Code Section 32-6-241, is declared to be a public and private nuisance and may be forthwith removed, obliterated, or abated at the order of the commissioner. The department may then submit by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery a statement of the expenses of such removal, obliteration, or abatement to the person owning or operating such junkyard; and, if payment is not made to the department within 60 days of receipt thereof, the department shall certify the amount for collection to the Attorney General.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 433, § 11; Code 1933, § 95A-910, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that the 2000 amendment was applicable to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

Law reviews.

For article, “Recommendations Regarding Control of Outdoor Advertising Along the Interstate Highway System in Georgia,” see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 308 (1963).

32-6-247.
Penalty.

Any person who violates any provision of this article or any lawful regulation promulgated pursuant to this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day’s presence of the offending junkyard shall be a separate offense.

State and local law enforcement officers shall assist department employees in enforcing this article or any lawful regulation promulgated pursuant thereto.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 433, § 15; Code 1933, § 95A-912, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 32.

Law reviews.

For article, “Recommendations Regarding Control of Outdoor Advertising Along the Interstate Highway System in Georgia,” see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 308 (1963).

32-6-248.
Construction of article.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as to abrogate or affect the provisions of any lawful ordinance, regulation, resolution, or other law which are more restrictive than the provisions of this article.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 433, § 12; Code 1933, § 95A-912, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Recommendations Regarding Control of Outdoor Advertising Along the Interstate Highway System in Georgia,” see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 308 (1963).